Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.63.030

Development of policies and mechanisms for defining and reviewing commercial activities.

Institutions of higher education in consultation with local business organizations and representatives of the small business community are required to develop:

(1) Comprehensive policies that define the legitimate purposes under which the institutions shall provide goods, services, or facilities that are practically available from private businesses;

(2) A mechanism for reviewing current and proposed commercial activities to ensure that activities are consistent with institutional policies; and

(3) A mechanism for receiving, reviewing, and responding to enquiries from private businesses about commercial activities carried on by institutions of higher education.

[ 1987 c 97 s 3.]